Maine, session 132, LD342.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶B-3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1), division (g) to read:
(g) Anaerobic digestion of by-products of waste from animals or agricultural
crops, food or vegetative material, algae or organic refuse; or
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶B-3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) That relies on wind power installations or solar power installations.; or
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶B-3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 477, §1, is
further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) That relies on a nuclear power plant, as defined in section 4352, subsection 9,
that is constructed after January 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2009, c. 542, §5, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) That qualifies as a small power production facility under the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission rules, 18 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 292, Subpart
B, as in effect on January 1, 1997; or
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2009, c. 542, §5, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2), division (h) to read:
(h) Generators fueled by municipal solid waste in conjunction with recycling.;
or
Sec. 6. 35-A MRSA §3210, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2009, c. 542, §5, is
further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) That relies on a nuclear power plant, as defined in section 4352, subsection 9,
that is constructed after January 1, 2025.